North Carolina, session 2025, HB349.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. HEALTH CARE POWERS OF ATTORNEY
SECTION 1.1. G.S. 32A-16(6) reads as rewritten:
"(6) Qualified witness. – Except as provided in G.S. 32A-16.1, a witness in whose
presence the principal has executed the health care power of attorney, who
believes the principal to be of sound mind, and who states that he or she (i) is
meets all of the following criteria:
a. The witness is not related within the third degree to the principal nor
to the principal's spouse, (ii) does spouse.
b. The witness does not know nor have a reasonable expectation that he
or she would be entitled to any portion of the estate of the principal
upon the principal's death under any existing will or codicil of the
principal or under the Intestate Succession Act as it then provides, (iii)
provides.
c. The witness does not have a claim against any portion of the estate of
the principal at the time of the principal's execution of the health care
power of attorney.
d. The witness is not the attending physician or mental health treatment
provider of the principal, nor a licensed health care provider who is a
paid employee of the attending physician or mental health treatment
provider, nor a paid employee of a health facility in which the principal
is a patient, nor a paid employee of a nursing home or any adult care
home in which the principal resides, and (iv) does not have a claim
against any portion of the estate of the principal at the time of the
principal's execution of the health care power of attorney.resides,
unless the witness has both (i) received training on recognizing
whether the declarant meets the legal requirements for competency to
execute the health care power of attorney and (ii) has been designated
*H349-v-4*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
by his or her employer to serve as a witness to the execution of the
health care power of attorney."
SECTION 1.2. G.S. 32A-25.1(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The use of the following form in the creation of a health care power of attorney is
lawful and, when used, it shall meet the requirements of and be construed in accordance with the
provisions of this Article:

HEALTH CARE POWER OF ATTORNEY

NOTE: YOU SHOULD USE THIS DOCUMENT TO NAME A PERSON AS YOUR
HEALTH CARE AGENT IF YOU ARE COMFORTABLE GIVING THAT PERSON
BROAD AND SWEEPING POWERS TO MAKE HEALTH CARE DECISIONS FOR
YOU. THERE IS NO LEGAL REQUIREMENT THAT ANYONE EXECUTE A
HEALTH CARE POWER OF ATTORNEY.

EXPLANATION: You have the right to name someone to make health care decisions for you
when you cannot make or communicate those decisions. This form may be used to create a health
care power of attorney, and meets the requirements of North Carolina law. However, you are
not required to use this form, and North Carolina law allows the use of other forms that meet
certain requirements. If you prepare your own health care power of attorney, you should be very
careful to make sure it is consistent with North Carolina law.

This document gives the person you designate as your health care agent broad powers to make
health care decisions for you when you cannot make the decision yourself or cannot communicate
your decision to other people. You should discuss your wishes concerning life-prolonging
measures, mental health treatment, and other health care decisions with your health care agent.
Except to the extent that you express specific limitations or restrictions in this form, your health
care agent may make any health care decision you could make yourself.

This form does not impose a duty on your health care agent to exercise granted powers, but when
a power is exercised, your health care agent will be obligated to use due care to act in your best
interests and in accordance with this document.

This Health Care Power of Attorney form is intended to be valid in any jurisdiction in which it
is presented, but places outside North Carolina may impose requirements that this form does not
meet.

If you want to use this form, you must complete it, sign it, and have your signature witnessed by
two qualified witnesses and proved by a notary public. Follow the instructions about which
choices you can initial very carefully. Do not sign this form until two witnesses and a notary
public are present to watch you sign it. You then should give a copy to your health care agent
and to any alternates you name. You should consider filing it with the Advance Health Care
Directive Registry maintained by the North Carolina Secretary of State:
http://www.nclifelinks.org/ahcdr/State.

1. Designation of Health Care Agent.

I, __________________, being of sound mind, hereby appoint the following person(s) to serve
as my health care agent(s) to act for me and in my name (in any way I could act in person) to
make health care decisions for me as authorized in this document. My designated health care
agent(s) shall serve alone, in the order named.
Page 2 House Bill 349-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

A. Name: _______________________ Home Telephone: _______________
Home Address: _______________________ Work Telephone: _______________
____________________________________ Cellular Telephone: _______________

B. Name: _______________________ Home Telephone: _______________
Home Address: _______________________ Work Telephone: _______________
____________________________________ Cellular Telephone: _______________

C. Name: _______________________ Home Telephone: _______________
Home Address: _______________________ Work Telephone: _______________
____________________________________ Cellular Telephone: _______________

Any successor health care agent designated shall be vested with the same power and duties as if
originally named as my health care agent, and shall serve any time his or her predecessor is not
reasonably available or is unwilling or unable to serve in that capacity.

2. Effectiveness of Appointment.

My designation of a health care agent expires only when I revoke it. Absent revocation, the
authority granted in this document shall become effective when and if one of the physician(s)
listed below determines that I lack capacity to make or communicate decisions relating to my
health care, and will continue in effect during that incapacity, or until my death, except if I
authorize my health care agent to exercise my rights with respect to anatomical gifts, autopsy, or
disposition of my remains, this authority will continue after my death to the extent necessary to
exercise that authority.

1. _______________________ (Physician)

2. _______________________ (Physician)

If I have not designated a physician, or no physician(s) named above is reasonably available, the
determination that I lack capacity to make or communicate decisions relating to my health care
shall be made by my attending physician.

3. Revocation.

Any time while I am competent, I may revoke this power of attorney in a writing I sign or by
communicating my intent to revoke, in any clear and consistent manner, to my health care agent
or my health care provider.

4. General Statement of Authority Granted.

Subject to any restrictions set forth in Section 5 below, I grant to my health care agent full power
and authority to make and carry out all health care decisions for me. These decisions include, but
are not limited to:

A. Requesting, reviewing, and receiving any information, verbal or written,
regarding my physical or mental health, including, but not limited to, medical
and hospital records, and to consent to the disclosure of this information.

House Bill 349-Fourth Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
B. Employing or discharging my health care providers.

C. Consenting to and authorizing my admission to and discharge from a hospital,
nursing or convalescent home, hospice, long-term care facility, or other health
care facility.

D. Consenting to and authorizing my admission to and retention in a facility for
the care or treatment of mental illness.

E. Consenting to and authorizing the administration of medications for mental
health treatment and electroconvulsive treatment (ECT) commonly referred to
as "shock treatment."

F. Giving consent for, withdrawing consent for, or withholding consent for,
X-ray, anesthesia, medication, surgery, and all other diagnostic and treatment
procedures ordered by or under the authorization of a licensed physician,
dentist, podiatrist, or other health care provider. This authorization
specifically includes the power to consent to measures for relief of pain.

G. Authorizing the withholding or withdrawal of life-prolonging measures.

H. Providing my medical information at the request of any individual acting as
my attorney-in-fact under a durable power of attorney or as a Trustee or
successor Trustee under any Trust Agreement of which I am a Grantor or
Trustee, or at the request of any other individual whom my health care agent
believes should have such information. I desire that such information be
provided whenever it would expedite the prompt and proper handling of my
affairs or the affairs of any person or entity for which I have some
responsibility. In addition, I authorize my health care agent to take any and all
legal steps necessary to ensure compliance with my instructions providing
access to my protected health information. Such steps shall include resorting
to any and all legal procedures in and out of courts as may be necessary to
enforce my rights under the law and shall include attempting to recover
attorneys' fees against anyone who does not comply with this health care
power of attorney.

I. To the extent I have not already made valid and enforceable arrangements
during my lifetime that have not been revoked, exercising any right I may
have to authorize an autopsy or direct the disposition of my remains.

J. Taking any lawful actions that may be necessary to carry out these decisions,
including, but not limited to: (i) signing, executing, delivering, and
acknowledging any agreement, release, authorization, or other document that
may be necessary, desirable, convenient, or proper in order to exercise and
carry out any of these powers; (ii) granting releases of liability to medical
providers or others; and (iii) incurring reasonable costs on my behalf related
to exercising these powers, provided that this health care power of attorney
shall not give my health care agent general authority over my property or
financial affairs.

5. Special Provisions and Limitations.
Page 4 House Bill 349-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

(Notice: The authority granted in this document is intended to be as broad as possible so that
your health care agent will have authority to make any decisions you could make to obtain or
terminate any type of health care treatment or service. If you wish to limit the scope of your
health care agent's powers, you may do so in this section. If none of the following are initialed,
there will be no special limitations on your agent's authority.)

A. Limitations about Artificial Nutrition or Hydration: In exercising the
authority to make health care decisions on my behalf, my health care
agent:
______________ shall NOT have the authority to withhold artificial nutrition
(Initial) (such as through tubes) OR may exercise that authority only
in accordance with the following special provisions:
__________________________________________________
__________________________________________________

______________ shall NOT have the authority to withhold artificial hydration
(Initial) (such as through tubes) OR may exercise that authority only
in accordance with the following special provisions:
__________________________________________________
__________________________________________________
NOTE: If you initial either block but do not insert any special
provisions, your health care agent shall have NO AUTHORITY
to withhold artificial nutrition or hydration.

______________ B. Limitations Concerning Health Care Decisions. In exercising
(Initial) the authority to make health care decisions on my behalf, the
authority of my health care agent is subject to the following
special provisions: (Here you may include any specific
provisions you deem appropriate such as: your own definition
of when life-prolonging measures should be withheld or
discontinued, or instructions to refuse any specific types of
treatment that are inconsistent with your religious beliefs, or
are unacceptable to you for any other reason.)
__________________________________________________
__________________________________________________
NOTE: DO NOT initial unless you insert a limitation.

______________ C. Limitations Concerning Mental Health Decisions. In
(Initial) exercising the authority to make mental health decisions on
my behalf, the authority of my health care agent is subject to
the following special provisions: (Here you may include any
specific provisions you deem appropriate such as: limiting
the grant of authority to make only mental health treatment
decisions, your own instructions regarding the administration
or withholding of psychotropic medications and
electroconvulsive treatment (ECT), instructions regarding
your admission to and retention in a health care facility for
mental health treatment, or instructions to refuse any specific
types of treatment that are unacceptable to you.)
__________________________________________________
House Bill 349-Fourth Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
__________________________________________________
NOTE: DO NOT initial unless you insert a limitation.

______________ D. Advance Instruction for Mental Health Treatment. (Notice:
(Initial) This health care power of attorney may incorporate or be
combined with an advance instruction for mental health
treatment, executed in accordance with Part 2 of Article 3 of
Chapter 122C of the General Statutes, which you may use to
state your instructions regarding mental health treatment in
the event you lack capacity to make or communicate mental
health treatment decisions. Because your health care agent's
decisions must be consistent with any statements you have
expressed in an advance instruction, you should indicate here
whether you have executed an advance instruction for mental
health treatment):
__________________________________________________
__________________________________________________
NOTE: DO NOT initial unless you insert a limitation.

______________ E. Autopsy and Disposition of Remains. In exercising the
(Initial) authority to make decisions regarding autopsy and disposition
of remains on my behalf, the authority of my health care agent
is subject to the following special provisions and limitations.
(Here you may include any specific limitations you deem
appropriate such as: limiting the grant of authority and the
scope of authority, or instructions regarding burial or
cremation):
__________________________________________________
__________________________________________________
NOTE: DO NOT initial unless you insert a limitation.

6. Organ Donation.

To the extent I have not already made valid and enforceable arrangements during my lifetime
that have not been revoked, my health care agent may exercise any right I may have to:

______________ donate any needed organs or parts; or
(Initial)
______________ donate only the following organs or parts:
(Initial)
__________________________________________________
NOTE: DO NOT INITIAL BOTH BLOCKS ABOVE.

______________ donate my body for anatomical study if needed.
(Initial)
______________ In exercising the authority to make donations, my health care
(Initial) agent is subject to the following special provisions and
limitations: (Here you may include any specific limitations
you deem appropriate such as: limiting the grant of authority
and the scope of authority, or instructions regarding gifts of
the body or body parts.)
Page 6 House Bill 349-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
__________________________________________________
__________________________________________________
__________________________________________________

NOTE: DO NOT initial unless you insert a limitation.

NOTE: NO AUTHORITY FOR ORGAN DONATION IS GRANTED IN
THIS INSTRUMENT WITHOUT YOUR INITIALS.

7. Guardianship Provision.

If it becomes necessary for a court to appoint a guardian of my person, I nominate the persons
designated in Section 1, in the order named, to be the guardian of my person, to serve without
bond or security. The guardian shall act consistently with G.S. 35A-1201(a)(5).

8. Reliance of Third Parties on Health Care Agent.

A. No person who relies in good faith upon the authority of or any representations
by my health care agent shall be liable to me, my estate, my heirs, successors,
assigns, or personal representatives, for actions or omissions in reliance on
that authority or those representations.
B. The powers conferred on my health care agent by this document may be
exercised by my health care agent alone, and my health care agent's signature
or action taken under the authority granted in this document may be accepted
by persons as fully authorized by me and with the same force and effect as if
I were personally present, competent, and acting on my own behalf. All acts
performed in good faith by my health care agent pursuant to this power of
attorney are done with my consent and shall have the same validity and effect
as if I were present and exercised the powers myself, and shall inure to the
benefit of and bind me, my estate, my heirs, successors, assigns, and personal
representatives. The authority of my health care agent pursuant to this power
of attorney shall be superior to and binding upon my family, relatives, friends,
and others.

9. Miscellaneous Provisions.

A. Revocation of Prior Powers of Attorney. I revoke any prior health care power
of attorney. The preceding sentence is not intended to revoke any general
powers of attorney, some of the provisions of which may relate to health care;
however, this power of attorney shall take precedence over any health care
provisions in any valid general power of attorney I have not revoked.

B. Jurisdiction, Severability, and Durability. This Health Care Power of Attorney
is intended to be valid in any jurisdiction in which it is presented. The powers
delegated under this power of attorney are severable, so that the invalidity of
one or more powers shall not affect any others. This power of attorney shall
not be affected or revoked by my incapacity or mental incompetence.

C. Health Care Agent Not Liable. My health care agent and my health care
agent's estate, heirs, successors, and assigns are hereby released and forever
discharged by me, my estate, my heirs, successors, assigns, and personal
House Bill 349-Fourth Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
representatives from all liability and from all claims or demands of all kinds
arising out of my health care agent's acts or omissions, except for my health
care agent's willful misconduct or gross negligence.

D. No Civil or Criminal Liability. No act or omission of my health care agent, or
of any other person, entity, institution, or facility acting in good faith in
reliance on the authority of my health care agent pursuant to this Health Care
Power of Attorney shall be considered suicide, nor the cause of my death for
any civil or criminal purposes, nor shall it be considered unprofessional
conduct or as lack of professional competence. Any person, entity, institution,
or facility against whom criminal or civil liability is asserted because of
conduct authorized by this Health Care Power of Attorney may interpose this
document as a defense.

E. Reimbursement. My health care agent shall be entitled to reimbursement for
all reasonable expenses incurred as a result of carrying out any provision of
this directive.

By signing here, I indicate that I am mentally alert and competent, fully informed as to the
contents of this document, and understand the full import of this grant of powers to my health
care agent.

This the _____ day of ______________, 20____.

________________________(SEAL)

I hereby state that the principal, _______________, being of sound mind, signed (or directed
another to sign on the principal's behalf) the foregoing health care power of attorney in my
presence, and that I am not related to the principal by blood or marriage, and I would not be
entitled to any portion of the estate of the principal under any existing will or codicil of the
principal or as an heir under the Intestate Succession Act, if the principal died on this date without
a will. I also state that that, unless I have received training on recognizing whether the declarant
meets the legal requirements for competency to execute the health care power of attorney and
have been designated by my employer to serve as a witness to the execution of the health care
power of attorney, I am not the principal's attending physician, nor a licensed health care provider
or mental health treatment provider who is (1) an employee of the principal's attending physician
or mental health treatment provider, (2) an employee of the health facility in which the principal
is a patient, or (3) an employee of a nursing home or any adult care home where the principal
resides. I further state that I do not have any claim against the principal or the estate of the
principal.

Date: _____________________________ Witness: ___________________________

Date: _____________________________ Witness: ___________________________

________________COUNTY, _________________STATE

Sworn to (or affirmed) and subscribed before me this day by _____________________
(type/print name of signer)

______________________
Page 8 House Bill 349-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(type/print name of witness)

______________________
(type/print name of witness)


Date: ___________________________ ______________________________
(Official Seal) Signature of Notary Public

__________________, Notary Public
Printed or typed name

My commission expires: __________"

PART II. ADVANCE HEALTH CARE DIRECTIVES
SECTION 2.1. G.S. 90-321(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) The attending physician shall follow, subject to subsections (b), (e), and (k) of this
section, a declaration:declaration meeting all of the following:
(1) That expresses a desire of the declarant that life-prolonging measures not be
used to prolong the declarant's life if, as specified in the declaration as to any
or all of the following:
a. The declarant has an incurable or irreversible condition that will result
in the declarant's death within a relatively short period of time; ortime.
b. The declarant becomes unconscious and, to a high degree of medical
certainty, will never regain consciousness; orconsciousness.
c. The declarant suffers from advanced dementia or any other condition
resulting in the substantial loss of cognitive ability and that loss, to a
high degree of medical certainty, is not reversible.
(2) That states that the declarant is aware that the declaration authorizes a
physician to withhold or discontinue the life-prolonging measures;
andmeasures.
(3) Except as provided in G.S. 90-321.1, that has been signed by the declarant in
the presence of two witnesses who believe the declarant to be of sound mind
and who state that they (i) are all of the following are true:
a. The witness is not related within the third degree to the declarant or to
the declarant's spouse, (ii) do spouse.
b. The witness does not know or have a reasonable expectation that they
he or she would be entitled to any portion of the estate of the declarant
upon the declarant's death under any will of the declarant or codicil
thereto then existing or under the Intestate Succession Act as it then
provides, (iii) are not provides.
c. The witness does not have a claim against any portion of the estate of
the declarant at the time of the declaration.
d. The witness is not the attending physician, a licensed health care
providers provider who are paid employees is a paid employee of the
attending physician, a paid employees employee of a health facility in
which the declarant is a patient, or a paid employees employee of a
nursing home or any adult care home in which the declarant
resides,and (iv) do not have a claim against any portion of the estate
of the declarant at the time of the declaration; andresides, unless the
witness has both (i) received training on recognizing whether the
House Bill 349-Fourth Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
declarant meets the legal requirements for competency to execute the
Advanced Directive for a Natural Death and (ii) been designated by
his or her employer to serve as a witness to the execution of the
Advanced Directive for a Natural Death.
(4) That has been proved before a clerk or assistant clerk of superior court, or a
notary public who certifies substantially as set out in subsection (d1) of this
section. A notary who takes the acknowledgement may but is not required to
be a paid employee of the attending physician, a paid employee of a health
facility in which the declarant is a patient, or a paid employee of a nursing
home or any adult care home in which the declarant resides."
SECTION 2.2. G.S. 90-321(d1) reads as rewritten:
"(d1) The following form is specifically determined to meet the requirements of subsection
(c) of this section:

ADVANCE DIRECTIVE FOR A NATURAL DEATH ("LIVING WILL")

NOTE: YOU SHOULD USE THIS DOCUMENT TO GIVE YOUR HEALTH CARE
PROVIDERS INSTRUCTIONS TO WITHHOLD OR WITHDRAW
LIFE-PROLONGING MEASURES IN CERTAIN SITUATIONS. THERE IS NO LEGAL
REQUIREMENT THAT ANYONE EXECUTE A LIVING WILL.

GENERAL INSTRUCTIONS: You can use this Advance Directive ("Living Will") form to give
instructions for the future if you want your health care providers to withhold or withdraw
life-prolonging measures in certain situations. You should talk to your doctor about what these
terms mean. The Living Will states what choices you would have made for yourself if you were
able to communicate. Talk to your family members, friends, and others you trust about your
choices. Also, it is a good idea to talk with professionals such as your doctors, clergypersons,
and lawyers before you complete and sign this Living Will.

You do not have to use this form to give those instructions, but if you create your own Advance
Directive you need to be very careful to ensure that it is consistent with North Carolina law.

This Living Will form is intended to be valid in any jurisdiction in which it is presented, but places
outside North Carolina may impose requirements that this form does not meet.

If you want to use this form, you must complete it, sign it, and have your signature witnessed by
two qualified witnesses and proved by a notary public. Follow the instructions about which
choices you can initial very carefully. Do not sign this form until two witnesses and a notary
public are present to watch you sign it. You then should consider giving a copy to your primary
physician and/or a trusted relative, and should consider filing it with the Advanced Health Care
Directive Registry maintained by the North Carolina Secretary of State:
http://www.nclifelinks.org/ahcdr/State:

My Desire for a Natural Death

I, ____________________, being of sound mind, desire that, as specified below, my life not be
prolonged by life-prolonging measures:

1. When My Directives Apply

Page 10 House Bill 349-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
My directions about prolonging my life shall apply IF my attending physician determines
that I lack capacity to make or communicate health care decisions and:

NOTE: YOU MAY INITIAL ANY AND ALL OF THESE CHOICES.

_________ I have an incurable or irreversible condition that will result
(Initial) in my death within a relatively short period of time.

_________ I become unconscious and my health care providers
(Initial) determine that, to a high degree of medical certainty, I will
never regain my consciousness.

_________ I suffer from advanced dementia or any other condition
(Initial) which results in the substantial loss of my cognitive ability
and my health care providers determine that, to a high
degree of medical certainty, this loss is not reversible.

2. These are My Directives about Prolonging My Life:

In those situations I have initialed in Section 1, I direct that my health care providers:

NOTE: INITIAL ONLY IN ONE PLACE.

_________ may withhold or withdraw life-prolonging measures.
(Initial)

_________ shall withhold or withdraw life-prolonging measures.
(Initial)

3. Exceptions – "Artificial Nutrition or Hydration"

NOTE: INITIAL ONLY IF YOU WANT TO MAKE EXCEPTIONS TO YOUR
INSTRUCTIONS IN PARAGRAPH 2.

EVEN THOUGH I do not want my life prolonged in those situations I have initialed in
Section 1:
_________ I DO want to receive BOTH artificial hydration AND
(Initial) artificial nutrition (for example, through tubes) in those
situations.

NOTE: DO NOT INITIAL THIS BLOCK IF ONE OF THE
BLOCKS BELOW IS INITIALED.

_________I DO want to receive ONLY artificial hydration (for
(Initial) example, through tubes) in those situations.

NOTE: DO NOT INITIAL THE BLOCK ABOVE OR
BELOW IF THIS BLOCK IS INITIALED.

_________ I DO want to receive ONLY artificial nutrition (for
(Initial) example, through tubes) in those situations.
House Bill 349-Fourth Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

NOTE: DO NOT INITIAL EITHER OF THE TWO
BLOCKS ABOVE IF THIS BLOCK IS INITIALED.

4. I Wish to be Made as Comfortable as Possible

I direct that my health care providers take reasonable steps to keep me as clean,
comfortable, and free of pain as possible so that my dignity is maintained, even though
this care may hasten my death.

5. I Understand my Advance Directive

I am aware and understand that this document directs certain life-prolonging measures to
be withheld or discontinued in accordance with my advance instructions.

6. If I have an Available Health Care Agent

If I have appointed a health care agent by executing a health care power of attorney or
similar instrument, and that health care agent is acting and available and gives instructions
that differ from this Advance Directive, then I direct that:

_________ Follow Advance Directive: This Advance Directive will
(Initial) override instructions my health care agent gives about
prolonging my life.

_________ Follow Health Care Agent: My health care agent has
(Initial) authority to override this Advance Directive.

NOTE: DO NOT INITIAL BOTH BLOCKS. IF YOU DO NOT INITIAL EITHER
BOX, THEN YOUR HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS WILL FOLLOW THIS
ADVANCE DIRECTIVE AND IGNORE THE INSTRUCTIONS OF YOUR HEALTH
CARE AGENT ABOUT PROLONGING YOUR LIFE.

7. My Health Care Providers May Rely on this Directive

My health care providers shall not be liable to me or to my family, my estate, my heirs,
or my personal representative for following the instructions I give in this instrument.
Following my directions shall not be considered suicide, or the cause of my death, or
malpractice or unprofessional conduct. If I have revoked this instrument but my health
care providers do not know that I have done so, and they follow the instructions in this
instrument in good faith, they shall be entitled to the same protections to which they
would have been entitled if the instrument had not been revoked.

8. I Want this Directive to be Effective Anywhere

I intend that this Advance Directive be followed by any health care provider in any place.

9. I have the Right to Revoke this Advance Directive

I understand that at any time I may revoke this Advance Directive in a writing I sign or
by communicating in any clear and consistent manner my intent to revoke it to my
Page 12 House Bill 349-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
attending physician. I understand that if I revoke this instrument I should try to destroy
all copies of it.

This the ________ day of ____________, _________.

___________________________________
Print Name __________________________

I hereby state that the declarant, ______________________, being of sound mind, signed (or
directed another to sign on declarant's behalf) the foregoing Advance Directive for a Natural
Death in my presence, and that I am not related to the declarant by blood or marriage, and I would
not be entitled to any portion of the estate of the declarant under any existing will or codicil of
the declarant or as an heir under the Intestate Succession Act, if the declarant died on this date
without a will. I also state that that, unless I have received training on recognizing whether the
declarant meets the legal requirements for competency to execute the Advanced Directive for a
Natural Death and have been designated by my employer to serve as a witness to the execution
of the Advanced Directive for a Natural Death, I am not the declarant's attending physician, nor
a licensed health care provider who is (1) an employee of the declarant's attending physician, (2)
nor an employee of the health facility in which the declarant is a patient, or (3) an employee of a
nursing home or any adult care home where the declarant resides. I further state that I do not have
any claim against the declarant or the estate of the declarant.

Date: _____________________________ Witness: ___________________________

Date: _____________________________ Witness: ___________________________

________________COUNTY, _________________STATE

Sworn to (or affirmed) and subscribed before me this day by _____________________
(type/print name of declarant)

________________________
(type/print name of witness)

________________________
(type/print name of witness)

Date ___________________________ ______________________________
(Official Seal) Signature of Notary Public

__________________, Notary Public
Printed or typed name

My commission expires: _________"

PART III. ELECTRONIC FILING OF HEALTH CARE POWERS OF ATTORNEY AND
ADVANCE HEALTH CARE DIRECTIVES WITH THE NORTH CAROLINA
SECRETARY OF STATE
SECTION 3.1. G.S. 130A-466 reads as rewritten:
"§ 130A-466. Filing requirements.
House Bill 349-Fourth Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) A person may submit any of the following documents and the revocations of these
documents to the Secretary of State in electronic or hard copy format for filing in the Advance
Health Care Directive Registry established pursuant to this Article:
(1) A health care power of attorney under Article 3 of Chapter 32A of the General
Statutes.
(2) A declaration of a desire for a natural death under Article 23 of Chapter 90 of
the General Statutes.
(3) An advance instruction for mental health treatment under Part 2 of Article 3
of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes.
(4) A declaration of an anatomical gift under Part 3A of Article 16 of Chapter
130A of the General Statutes.
(5) A Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA) waiver.
(b) Any document and any revocation of a document submitted for filing in the registry
shall be notarized regardless of whether notarization is required for its validity. This subsection
does not apply to a declaration of an anatomical gift described in subdivision (a)(4) of this
section.
(c) The document may be submitted for filing only by the person who executed the
document.
(d) The person who submits the document shall supply a return address.
(e) The document shall be accompanied by any fee required by this Article."
SECTION 3.2. G.S. 130A-468 reads as rewritten:
"§ 130A-468. Filing of documents with the registry.
(a) When the Secretary of State receives a hard copy of a document that may be filed
with the registry pursuant to this Article, the Secretary shall create a digital reproduction of that
document and enter the reproduced document into the registry database. When the Secretary of
State receives a document in electronic format that may be filed with the registry pursuant to this
Article, the Secretary shall enter that document into the registry database. The Secretary is not
required to review a document to ensure that it complies with the particular statutory
requirements applicable to the document. Each document entered into the registry database shall
be assigned a unique file number and password.
(b) Upon entering the a reproduced hard copy of a document into the registry database,
the Secretary shall return the original hard copy of the document and a wallet-size card containing
the document's file number and password to the person who submitted the document. Upon
entering into the registry database a document that was received in electronic format, the
Secretary shall send a wallet-size card containing the document's file number and password to
the person who submitted the document.
(c) When the Secretary of State receives a revocation of a document that is filed with the
registry and that document's file number and password, or a request to remove that document
from the registry without its revocation, the Secretary shall delete that document from the registry
database.
(c1) The Secretary of State may remove documents of deceased registrants from the
registry upon notification of death in writing in a form acceptable to the Secretary of State.
(d) The Secretary of State's entry of a document into, or removal of a document from, the
registry database does not do any of the following:
(1) Affect the validity of the document in whole or in part.
(2) Relate to the accuracy of information contained in the document.
(3) Create a presumption regarding the validity of the document, regarding the
accuracy of information contained in the document, or that the statutory
requirements for the document have been met."

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
Page 14 House Bill 349-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective October 1, 2026.
House Bill 349-Fourth Edition Page 15